Maryland, session 2026, SB0183.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Safety
13–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Department” means the Military Department.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0183*

SENATE BILL 183
(c) “MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE” MEANS THE MILITARY FORCE
ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBTITLE 5A OF THIS TITLE.
(D) “Maryland Defense Force” means the military force established under Subtitle
5 of this title.
[(d)] (E) “National Guard” means the Maryland Army National Guard and
Maryland Air National Guard.
[(e)] (F) (1) “State active duty” means military duty performed in service of
the State by a unit or member of the militia under orders issued by the Governor under
Article II, § 8 of the Maryland Constitution or § 13–702 of this title.
(2) Unless the Governor specifically provides otherwise, “State active duty”
does not include drill periods, preparation for drill periods, annual training, or other
equivalent training or duty conducted under orders issued under Title 10 or Title 32 of the
United States Code.
13–203.
(b) The organized militia of the State consists of:
(1) the National Guard;
(2) the Inactive National Guard; [and]
(3) the Maryland Defense Force; AND
(4) THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
13–206.
(a) An individual enlisting in the organized militia shall take and subscribe to the
following oath of enlistment:
“I do hereby acknowledge to have voluntarily enlisted this ....... day of .........., 20 .....,
in the (National Guard) (Maryland Defense Force) (MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE) of the
State of Maryland for the period of ...... year(s), under the conditions prescribed by law,
unless sooner discharged by proper authority. I, ..........., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that
I will bear true faith and allegiance to the United States of America and to the State of
Maryland; that I will serve them honestly and faithfully against all their enemies
whomsoever; and that I will obey the orders of the President of the United States and the
Governor of Maryland and the orders of the officers appointed over me, according to law
and regulations.”
13–210.

SENATE BILL 183 3
(a) (1) This subsection applies to the period of time that an employee is ordered
by the Governor to active military duty in the organized militia of the State for service
during:
(i) a civil disorder;
(ii) a natural disaster;
(iii) a labor disorder; [or]
(iv) A CYBER ATTACK; OR
(V) any other activity requiring support of the State militia.
(2) The Adjutant General shall secure compensation under the Maryland
Workers’ Compensation Act for each officer and enlisted individual of the organized militia
by maintaining an insurance policy with the Chesapeake Employers’ Insurance Company
or with a stock corporation or mutual association authorized to transact the business of
workers’ compensation insurance in the State.
(3) (i) An officer, enlisted individual, or employee of the Department is
not entitled to the benefits of this section if the officer, enlisted individual, or employee is
injured in the course of employment and has insurance coverage through the federal
government that is equal to or better than the coverage provided by this title.
(ii) If a benefit provided by the federal government is less than that
provided by the Maryland Workers’ Compensation Act, the State and its insurer shall
furnish the additional benefit necessary to make up the difference between the benefit
provided by the federal government and the similar benefit required under the Maryland
Workers’ Compensation Act.
(4) The insurance provided under this subsection shall only cover incidents
that occur after July 1, 1979.
(b) In addition to the benefits under subsection (a) of this section, the Adjutant
General shall maintain workers’ compensation insurance for members of the Maryland
Defense Force AND MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE during training.
(c) The Adjutant General shall pay the premiums for the insurance policy
required under this section from appropriations for the militia that the Governor includes
in the State budget.
SUBTITLE 5A. MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
13–5A–01.

SENATE BILL 183
(A) (1) THERE IS ESTABLISHED IN THE STATE A MARYLAND CYBER
RESERVE WITHIN THE MILITARY DEPARTMENT.
(2) THE GOVERNOR IS THE COMMANDER–IN–CHIEF OF THE
MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
(3) THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE IS UNDER THE OPERATIONAL
CONTROL OF THE ADJUTANT GENERAL.
(4) THERE IS A COMMANDING GENERAL OF THE MARYLAND CYBER
RESERVE WHO IS APPOINTED BY THE ADJUTANT GENERAL AND SERVES AT THE
PLEASURE OF THE ADJUTANT GENERAL.
(B) THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE IS A COMPONENT OF THE ORGANIZED
MILITIA OF THE STATE IN ADDITION TO AND SEPARATE FROM THE NATIONAL
GUARD.
(C) (1) THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE SHALL HAVE THE PRIMARY
MISSION OF PROVIDING EDUCATIONAL AND TECHNICAL SUPPORT TO PREVENT AND
RESOLVE CYBER ATTACKS AGAINST:
(I) STATE, COUNTY, AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT AGENCIES; AND
(II) CRITICAL INFRASTRUCTURE WITHIN THE STATE.
(2) THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE SHALL ALSO HAVE OTHER
DUTIES AND MISSIONS AS IT MAY BE ASSIGNED FROM TIME TO TIME BY COMPETENT
AUTHORITY, INCLUDING PROVIDING TECHNICAL SUPPORT TO:
(I) CORPORATIONS CONDUCTING BUSINESS WITHIN THE
STATE TARGETED IN A CYBER ATTACK; AND
(II) CITIZENS OF THE STATE TARGETED IN A CYBER ATTACK.
13–5A–02.
(A) (1) THE GOVERNOR MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SUBTITLE GOVERNING THE ENLISTMENT, ORGANIZATION, ADMINISTRATION,
EQUIPMENT, MAINTENANCE, TRAINING, AND DISCIPLINE OF THE MARYLAND CYBER
RESERVE.
(2) THE GOVERNOR MAY PRESCRIBE A UNIFORM FOR THE

SENATE BILL 183 5
MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
(B) (1) THE REGULATIONS SHALL PROHIBIT THE MARYLAND CYBER
RESERVE OR A MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE FROM ACCEPTING
GIFTS, DONATIONS, GRATUITIES, OR ANYTHING OF VALUE FROM A PERSON IN
EXCHANGE FOR SPECIFIC AND ISOLATED SERVICES RENDERED BY THE MARYLAND
CYBER RESERVE.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE INTERPRETED TO PROHIBIT
GIFTS, BEQUESTS, AND THE LIKE FROM ANY INDIVIDUAL OR ORGANIZATION TO THE
MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE OR ANY FOUNDATION OR THE LIKE ESTABLISHED TO
SUPPORT ITS ACTIVITIES.
13–5A–03.
(A) THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE CONSISTS OF:
(1) COMMISSIONED OR ASSIGNED OFFICERS; AND
(2) QUALIFIED INDIVIDUALS WHO VOLUNTEER TO SERVE AND ARE
COMMISSIONED, APPOINTED, OR ENLISTED IN THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL MAY NOT BE COMMISSIONED OR ENLISTED IN THE
MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE IF THE INDIVIDUAL:
(1) IS NOT A CITIZEN OF THE UNITED STATES;
(2) HAS BEEN DISMISSED FROM OR RECEIVED A BAD CONDUCT
DISCHARGE, A DISHONORABLE DISCHARGE, OR ANY DISCHARGE OTHER THAN
UNDER HONORABLE CONDITIONS FROM A MILITARY OR NAVAL ORGANIZATION OF
THIS STATE OR OF ANOTHER STATE, OR FROM ANY OF THE UNITED STATES ARMED
FORCES OR ITS AUXILIARIES, OR HAS BEEN CONVICTED OF AN OFFENSE UNDER THE
LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES OR OF ANY STATE PUNISHABLE BY IMPRISONMENT
FOR MORE THAN 1 YEAR, NO MATTER WHAT PUNISHMENT WAS ACTUALLY IMPOSED;
OR
(3) DOES NOT MEET THE QUALIFICATIONS FOR COMMISSIONING,
APPOINTMENT, OR ENLISTMENT SPECIFIED IN REGULATIONS GOVERNING THE
MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
(C) A CIVIL ORGANIZATION, A SOCIETY, A CLUB, A POST, AN ORDER, A
FRATERNITY, AN ASSOCIATION, A BROTHERHOOD, A BODY, A UNION, A LEAGUE, OR
ANY OTHER COMBINATION OF PERSONS OR CIVIL GROUPS MAY NOT ENLIST IN THE

SENATE BILL 183
MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE AS AN ORGANIZATION OR A UNIT.
(D) (1) ALL MEMBERS OF THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE SERVE ON A
VOLUNTARY BASIS AND WITHOUT PAY, UNLESS UNDER ORDERS, APPROVED BY THE
ADJUTANT GENERAL, SPECIFYING THAT THE MEMBER’S SERVICE IS WITH PAY.
(2) (I) IF AN ORDER APPROVED BY THE ADJUTANT GENERAL
SPECIFIES THAT THE SERVICE OF A MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE
IS WITH PAY, THE MEMBER SHALL RECEIVE A RATE OF PAY DETERMINED AND
PROVIDED BY RULE BY THE ADJUTANT GENERAL.
(II) THE RULE SHALL ESTABLISH A RATE OF PAY REASONABLE
AND COMMENSURATE WITH THE TRAINING, EXPERIENCE, AND PROFESSIONAL
QUALIFICATIONS OF THE MEMBER.
13–5A–04.
(A) AN OFFICER OR A WARRANT OFFICER COMMISSIONED OR APPOINTED IN
THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE SHALL TAKE THE OATH PRESCRIBED IN §
13–5A–07 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO ENLISTS IN THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE
SHALL TAKE AN OATH SUBSTANTIALLY IN THE FORM REQUIRED FOR ENLISTED
PERSONNEL OF THE NATIONAL GUARD, SUBSTITUTING “MARYLAND CYBER
RESERVE” WHERE NECESSARY IN THE OATH.
(C) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
THE ENLISTMENT PERIOD IN THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE IS DETERMINED BY
THE COMMANDING OFFICER BASED ON THE SPECIALTY OF THE RECRUIT AND THE
NEEDS OF THE MILITIA AND MAY BE RENEWED.
(2) IN THE CASE THAT A STATE OF WAR EXISTS BETWEEN THE UNITED
STATES AND ANY OTHER NATION, OR THAT THERE IS A FEDERAL OR STATE
DECLARATION OF EMERGENCY PRESENTLY IN FORCE IN THE STATE, ALL
ENLISTMENTS SHALL CONTINUE UNTIL 3 MONTHS AFTER SAID STATE OF WAR OR
EMERGENCY ENDS, UNLESS THE ENLISTED INDIVIDUAL IS DISCHARGED SOONER BY
PROPER AUTHORITY.
(D) THE GOVERNOR MAY ACCEPT THE RESIGNATION OF AN OFFICER OR
GRANT A DISCHARGE TO AN ENLISTED INDIVIDUAL AT ANY TIME.
13–5A–05.

SENATE BILL 183 7
(A) THE GOVERNOR MAY REQUISITION ANY ARMS AND EQUIPMENT FROM
THE UNITED STATES SECRETARY OF DEFENSE THAT ARE IN THE POSSESSION OF
AND CAN BE SPARED BY THE DEPARTMENT OF DEFENSE FOR USE BY THE
MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
(B) THE GOVERNOR MAY ALLOW THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE TO USE
THE FACILITIES AND EQUIPMENT OF A STATE ARMORY OR OTHER AVAILABLE STATE
PREMISES AND PROPERTY.
(C) A SCHOOL AUTHORITY MAY ALLOW THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE
TO USE A SCHOOL BUILDING OR SCHOOL GROUNDS.
13–5A–06.
(A) (1) THIS TITLE DOES NOT AUTHORIZE THE MARYLAND CYBER
RESERVE TO BE ORDERED OR DRAFTED INTO THE MILITARY SERVICE OF THE
UNITED STATES, EXCEPT BY ORDER OF THE PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES
ACTING PURSUANT TO THE CONSTITUTION AND LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES.
(2) THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO PROHIBIT
SERVICE OF THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE OR PERSONNEL THEREOF IN
MISSIONS IN WHICH FEDERAL MILITARY PERSONNEL ARE ALSO SERVING OR IN
COMMAND.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL IS NOT EXEMPT FROM MILITARY SERVICE UNDER THE
LAWS OF THE UNITED STATES BECAUSE THE INDIVIDUAL IS ENLISTED,
COMMISSIONED, OR APPOINTED IN THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
13–5A–07.
A COMMISSIONED OFFICER OF THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE SHALL TAKE
THE FOLLOWING OATH OF OFFICE:
“I, ..............., DO SOLEMNLY SWEAR THAT I WILL SUPPORT AND DEFEND THE
CONSTITUTION OF THE UNITED STATES AND THE CONSTITUTION OF THE STATE OF
MARYLAND, AGAINST ALL ENEMIES, FOREIGN AND DOMESTIC; THAT I WILL BEAR
TRUE FAITH AND ALLEGIANCE TO THE SAME; THAT I WILL OBEY THE ORDERS OF THE
PRESIDENT OF THE UNITED STATES AND OF THE GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF
MARYLAND; THAT I TAKE THIS OBLIGATION FREELY, WITHOUT ANY MENTAL
RESERVATION OR PURPOSE OF EVASION, AND THAT I WILL WELL AND FAITHFULLY
DISCHARGE THE DUTIES OF THE OFFICE OF ................... IN THE MARYLAND CYBER
RESERVE UPON WHICH I AM ABOUT TO ENTER, SO HELP ME GOD.”
13–5A–08.

SENATE BILL 183
(A) (1) THE GOVERNOR SHALL APPOINT AND COMMISSION EACH
COMMISSIONED OFFICER OR APPOINT EACH WARRANT OFFICER OF THE ORGANIZED
MILITIA ON RECOMMENDATION OF THE ADJUTANT GENERAL.
(2) THE APPOINTMENTS UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS
SUBSECTION DO NOT REQUIRE CONFIRMATION BY THE SENATE OF MARYLAND.
(B) (1) EACH INDIVIDUAL COMMISSIONED OR APPOINTED AS AN OFFICER
OR A WARRANT OFFICER SHALL BE:
(I) AN OFFICER, A WARRANT OFFICER, OR AN ENLISTED
INDIVIDUAL OF THE NATIONAL GUARD;
(II) A RETIRED OR FORMER OFFICER OR WARRANT OFFICER OF
THE UNITED STATES ARMY, NAVY, MARINE CORPS, AIR FORCE, OR COAST GUARD,
OR ANY AUXILIARY THEREOF;
(III) AN INDIVIDUAL WITH PRIOR ENLISTED SERVICE IN THE
UNITED STATES ARMY, NAVY, MARINE CORPS, AIR FORCE, OR COAST GUARD, OR
ANY AUXILIARY THEREOF;
(IV) A GRADUATE OF THE UNITED STATES MILITARY ACADEMY,
NAVAL ACADEMY, COAST GUARD ACADEMY, MERCHANT MARINE ACADEMY, OR
AIR FORCE ACADEMY;
(V) A GRADUATE OF A SCHOOL, A COLLEGE, A UNIVERSITY, OR
AN OFFICERS’ TRAINING SCHOOL WHO RECEIVED MILITARY INSTRUCTION UNDER
THE SUPERVISION OF AN OFFICER OF THE UNITED STATES ARMY, NAVY, MARINE
CORPS, AIR FORCE, OR COAST GUARD WHO CERTIFIED THE GRADUATE’S FITNESS
FOR APPOINTMENT AS A COMMISSIONED OFFICER; OR
(VI) AN INDIVIDUAL NOT OTHERWISE IDENTIFIED IN ITEMS (I)
THROUGH (V) OF THIS PARAGRAPH WHO IS SPECIALLY QUALIFIED FOR SERVICE BY
ACHIEVEMENT IN ANY PROFESSIONAL, TECHNICAL, OR PUBLIC SERVICE CAPACITY
OR OTHERWISE DISPLAYS EXTRAORDINARY QUALIFICATIONS FOR COMMISSIONING
AS AN OFFICER OF THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE.
(2) BEFORE TAKING OFFICE, EACH MEMBER OF THE NATIONAL
GUARD SHALL TAKE THE OATH PRESCRIBED IN § 13–407 OF THIS TITLE AND EACH
MEMBER OF THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE SHALL TAKE THE OATH PRESCRIBED
IN § 13–5A–07 OF THIS SUBTITLE.

SENATE BILL 183 9
(C) WHEN INITIALLY APPOINTED, A GENERAL OFFICER OR COLONEL OF
THE ORGANIZED MILITIA MUST:
(1) BE AN OFFICER IN THE NATIONAL GUARD OF A GRADE OF O–4 OR
HIGHER; OR
(2) HAVE SERVED IN ANY COMPONENT OR AUXILIARY OF THE UNITED
STATES ARMY, NAVY, MARINE CORPS, AIR FORCE, OR COAST GUARD OR
NATIONAL GUARD WITH THE GRADE OF O–4 OR HIGHER.
(D) WHEN INITIALLY APPOINTED, A LIEUTENANT COLONEL OR MAJOR OF
THE LINE MUST HAVE HAD SERVICE AS AN OFFICER FOR AT LEAST 2 YEARS IN ANY
COMPONENT OR AUXILIARY OF THE UNITED STATES ARMY, NAVY, MARINE CORPS,
AIR FORCE, OR COAST GUARD OR NATIONAL GUARD.
(E) SUBSECTIONS (C) AND (D) OF THIS SECTION DO NOT APPLY IN THE CASE
OF:
(1) OFFICERS PROMOTED TO THE GRADE OF MAJOR OR ABOVE FROM
WITHIN THE MARYLAND CYBER RESERVE; OR
(2) OFFICERS QUALIFIED UNDER SUBSECTION (B)(1)(VI) OF THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.